Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.220

Contract audit and investigative findings, enforcement actions, and status of agency resolution—Report.

The state auditor and the attorney general must annually by November 30th of each year, provide a collaborative report of contract audit and investigative findings, enforcement actions, and the status of agency resolution to the governor and the policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

[ 2012 c 224 s 24.]